src/morphology/stems/particles.lexc
LEXICON Particles

не+Pcle:не PCLE_  "" ;
дак+Pcle:дак PCLE_  "niin" ;
жӧ+Pcle:жӧ PCLE_  "-han" ;
и+Pcle:и PCLE_  "(verbi)-kin" ;
ни+Pcle:ни PCLE_  "" ;
нӧ+Pcle:нӧ PCLE_  "" ;
со+Pcle:со PCLE_  "niinpä" ;
эд+Pcle:эд PCLE_  "-hAn" ;
